Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-801
Act, how cited.

Sections 9-801 to 9-841 shall be known and may be cited as the State Lottery Act.

Laws 1991, LB 849, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 138, § 17;

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 114;

Laws 2006, LB 1039, § 1.